Tennessee, session 114, SB2693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 238 of the Acts of 1903, as amended and rewritten by Chapter 58
of the Private Acts of 2012, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting
SECTION 4.03 and substituting:
SECTION 4.03. QUALIFICATIONS FOR OFFICE. No person shall be eligible to
hold the office of Mayor or Alderman unless the person is a qualified voter under the
laws of the State of Tennessee and has been a bona fide resident of the City for at least
one (1) year next preceding the election in which the person is a candidate.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of Millington. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed
by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
SB2693
011723
- 1 -